California statutes. Civil Code
(b) No particular terminology is required to disclose the items set forth in subdivision (a) except as expressly provided in that subdivision.

(c) If payment of all or a portion of the downpayment is to be deferred, the deferred payment shall be reflected in the payment schedule disclosed pursuant to Regulation Z.

(d) If the downpayment includes property being traded in, the contract shall contain a brief description of that property.

(e) The contract shall contain the names and addresses of all persons to whom the notice required pursuant to Section 2983.2 and permitted pursuant to Sections 2983.5 and 2984 is to be sent.

(f) (1) If the contract includes a finance charge determined on the precomputed basis, the contract shall identify the method of computing the unearned portion of
 the finance charge in the event of prepayment in full of the buyer’s obligation and contain a statement of the amount or method of computation of any charge that may be deducted from the amount of any unearned finance charge in computing the amount that will be credited to the obligation or refunded to the buyer. The method of computing the unearned portion of the finance charge shall be sufficiently identified with a reference to the actuarial method if the computation will be under that method. The method of computing the unearned portion of the finance charge shall be sufficiently identified with a reference to the Rule of 78’s, the sum of the digits, or the sum of the periodic time balances method in all other cases, and those references shall be deemed to be equivalent for disclosure purposes.

(2) If the contract includes a finance
 charge that is determined on the simple-interest basis but provides for a minimum finance charge in the event of prepayment in full, the contract shall contain a statement of that fact and the amount of the minimum finance charge or its method of calculation.

(g) (1) If the contract includes a finance charge that is determined on the precomputed basis and provides that the unearned portion of the finance charge to be refunded upon full prepayment of the contract is to be determined by a method other than actuarial, the contract shall contain a notice, in at least 10-point boldface type if the contract is printed, reading as follows:   “Notice to buyer:   (1) Do not sign this agreement before you read it or if it contains any blank spaces to be filled in.   (2) You are entitled to a completely filled-in copy of this
 agreement.   (3) You can prepay the full amount due under this agreement at any time and obtain a partial refund of the finance charge if it is $1 or more. Because of the way the amount of this refund will be figured, the time when you prepay could increase the ultimate cost of credit under this agreement.   (4) If you default in the performance of your obligations under this agreement, the vehicle may be repossessed and you may be subject to suit and liability for the unpaid indebtedness evidenced by this agreement.”

(2) If the contract includes a finance charge that is determined on the precomputed basis and provides for the actuarial method for computing the unearned portion of the finance charge upon prepayment in full, the contract shall contain a notice, in at least 10-point boldface type if the contract is printed, reading as
 follows:
   “Notice to buyer:   (1) Do not sign this agreement before you read it or if it contains any blank spaces to be filled in.   (2) You are entitled to a completely filled-in copy of this agreement.   (3) You can prepay the full amount due under this agreement at any time and obtain a partial refund of the finance charge if it is $1 or more.   (4) If you default in the performance of your obligations under this agreement, the vehicle may be repossessed and you may be subject to suit and liability for the unpaid indebtedness evidenced by this agreement.”

(3) If the contract includes a finance charge that is determined on the simple-interest basis, the contract shall contain a notice, in at least 10-point boldface type if the contract is printed, reading as follows:   “Notice to buyer:   (1) Do not sign this agreement before you read
 it or if it contains any blank spaces to be filled in.   (2) You are entitled to a completely filled-in copy of this agreement.   (3) You can prepay the full amount due under this agreement at any time.   (4) If you default in the performance of your obligations under this agreement, the vehicle may be repossessed and you may be subject to suit and liability for the unpaid indebtedness evidenced by this agreement.”

(h) The contract shall contain a notice in at least 8-point boldface type, acknowledged by the buyer, that reads as follows:

“If you have a complaint concerning this sale, you should try to resolve it with the seller.

Complaints concerning unfair or deceptive practices or methods by the seller may be referred to the city attorney, the district attorney,
 or an investigator for the Department of Motor Vehicles, or any combination thereof.

After this contract is signed, the seller may not change the financing or payment terms unless you agree in writing to the change. You do not have to agree to any change, and it is an unfair or deceptive practice for the seller to make a unilateral change.
Buyer’s Signature”(i) (1) The contract shall contain an itemization of any insurance included as part of the amount financed disclosed pursuant to paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) and of any insurance included as part of the finance charge. The itemization shall identify the type of insurance coverage and the premium charged therefor, and, if the insurance expires before the date of the last scheduled installment included in the repayment schedule, the term of the insurance shall be stated.

(2) If any charge for insurance, other than for credit life or disability, is included in the contract balance and disbursement of any part thereof is to be made more than one year after the date of the conditional sale contract, any finance charge on the amount to be disbursed after one year shall be computed from the month the
 disbursement is to be made to the due date of the last installment under the conditional sale contract.

(j) (1) Except for contracts in which the finance charge or a portion of the finance charge is determined by the simple-interest basis and the amount financed disclosed pursuant to paragraph (8) of subdivision (a) is more than two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500), the dollar amount of the disclosed finance charge may not exceed the greater of:

(A) (i) One and one-half percent on so much of the unpaid balance as does not exceed two hundred twenty-five dollars ($225), 116 percent on so much of the unpaid balance in excess of two hundred
 twenty-five dollars ($225) as does not exceed nine hundred dollars ($900) and56 of 1 percent on so much of the unpaid balance in excess of nine hundred dollars ($900) as does not exceed two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500).

(ii) One percent of the entire unpaid balance; multiplied in either case by the number of months (computed on the basis of a full month for any fractional month period in excess of 15 days) elapsing between the date of the contract and the due date of the last installment.

(B) If the finance charge is determined by the precomputed basis, twenty-five dollars ($25).

(C) If the finance charge or a portion
 thereof is determined by the simple-interest basis:

(i) Twenty-five dollars ($25) if the unpaid balance does not exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000).

(ii) Fifty dollars ($50) if the unpaid balance exceeds one thousand dollars ($1,000) but does not exceed two thousand dollars ($2,000).

(iii) Seventy-five dollars ($75) if the unpaid balance exceeds two thousand dollars ($2,000).

(2) The holder of the contract shall not charge, collect, or receive a finance charge that exceeds the disclosed finance charge, except to the extent (A) caused by the holder’s receipt of one or more payments under a contract that provides for determination of the finance
 charge or a portion thereof on the 365-day basis at a time or times other than as originally scheduled whether or not the parties enter into an agreement pursuant to Section 2982.3, (B) permitted by paragraph (2), (3), or (4) of subdivision (c) of Section 226.17 of Regulation Z, or (C) permitted by subdivisions (a) and (c) of Section 2982.8.

(3) If the finance charge or a portion thereof is determined by the simple-interest basis and the amount of the unpaid balance exceeds five thousand dollars ($5,000), the holder of the contract may, in lieu of its right to a minimum finance charge under subparagraph (C) of paragraph (1), charge, receive, or collect on the date of the contract an administrative finance charge not to exceed seventy-five dollars ($75), provided that the sum of the administrative finance charge and the portion of the finance
 charge determined by the simple-interest basis shall not exceed the maximum total finance charge permitted by subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1). Any administrative finance charge that is charged, received, or collected by a holder shall be deemed a finance charge earned on the date of the contract.

(4) If a contract provides for unequal or irregular payments, or payments on other than a monthly basis, the maximum finance charge shall be at the effective rate provided for in paragraph (1), having due regard for the schedule of installments.

(k) The contract may provide that for each installment in default for a period of not less than 10 days the buyer shall pay a delinquency charge in an amount not to exceed in the aggregate 5 percent of the delinquent installment, which amount
 may be collected only once on any installment regardless of the period during which it remains in default. Payments timely received by the seller under an extension or deferral agreement may not be subject to a delinquency charge unless the charge is permitted by Section 2982.3. The contract may provide for reasonable collection costs and fees in the event of delinquency.

(l) Notwithstanding any provision of a contract to the contrary, the buyer may pay at any time before maturity the entire indebtedness evidenced by the contract without penalty. In the event of prepayment in full:

(1) If the finance charge was determined on the precomputed basis, the amount required to prepay the contract shall be the outstanding contract balance as of that date, provided, however, that
 the buyer shall be entitled to a refund credit in the amount of the unearned portion of the finance charge, except as provided in paragraphs (3) and (4). The amount of the unearned portion of the finance charge shall be at least as great a proportion of the finance charge, including any additional finance charge imposed pursuant to Section 2982.8 or other additional charge imposed because the contract has been extended, deferred, or refinanced, as the sum of the periodic monthly time balances payable more than 15 days after the date of prepayment bears to the sum of all the periodic monthly time balances under the schedule of installments in the contract or, if the contract has been extended, deferred, or refinanced, as so extended, deferred, or refinanced. If the amount of the refund credit is less than one dollar ($1), no refund credit need be made by the holder. Any refund credit may be made in cash
 or credited to the outstanding obligations of the buyer under the contract.

(2) If the finance charge or a portion of the finance charge was determined on the simple-interest basis, the amount required to prepay the contract shall be the outstanding contract balance as of that date, including any earned finance charges that are unpaid as of that date and, if applicable, the amount provided in paragraph (3), and provided further that in cases where a finance charge is determined on the 360-day basis, the payments received under the contract shall be assumed to have been received on their respective due dates regardless of the actual dates on which the payments were received.

(3) If the minimum finance charge provided by subparagraph (B) or subparagraph (C) of paragraph (1) of
 subdivision (j), if either is applicable, is greater than the earned finance charge as of the date of prepayment, the holder shall be additionally entitled to the difference.

(4) This subdivision shall not impair the right of the seller or the seller’s assignee to receive delinquency charges on delinquent installments and reasonable costs and fees as provided in subdivision (k) or extension or deferral agreement charges as provided in Section 2982.3.

(5) Notwithstanding any provision of a contract to the contrary, if the indebtedness created by any contract is satisfied prior to its maturity through surrender of the motor vehicle, repossession of the motor vehicle, redemption of the motor vehicle after repossession, or any judgment, the outstanding obligation of the buyer
 shall be determined as provided in paragraph (1) or (2), except that the buyer’s outstanding obligation shall be computed by the holder as of the date the holder recovers the value of the motor vehicle through disposition thereof or judgment is entered or, if the holder elects to keep the motor vehicle in satisfaction of the buyer’s indebtedness, as of the date the holder takes possession of the motor vehicle.

(m) Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter to the contrary, any information required to be disclosed in a conditional sale contract under this chapter may be disclosed in any manner, method, or terminology required or permitted under Regulation Z, as in effect at the time that disclosure is made, except that permitted by paragraph (2) of subdivision (c) of Section 226.18 of Regulation Z, if all of the requirements and
 limitations set forth in subdivision (a) are satisfied. This chapter does not prohibit the disclosure in that contract of additional information required or permitted under Regulation Z, as in effect at the time that disclosure is made.

(n) If the seller imposes a charge for document processing or to electronically register or transfer the vehicle, the contract shall contain a disclosure that the charge is not a governmental fee.

(o) A seller shall not impose an application fee for a transaction governed by this chapter.

(p) The seller or holder may charge and collect a fee not to exceed fifteen dollars ($15) for the return by a depository institution of a dishonored check, negotiated order of withdrawal, or share draft
 issued in connection with the contract if the contract so provides or if the contract contains a generalized statement that the buyer may be liable for collection costs incurred in connection with the contract.

(q) The contract shall disclose on its face, by printing the word “new” or “used” within a box outlined in red, that is not smaller than one-half inch high and one-half inch wide, whether the vehicle is sold as a new vehicle, as defined in Section 430 of the Vehicle Code, or as a used vehicle, as defined in Section 665 of the Vehicle Code.

(r) The contract shall contain the disclosure identified in subdivision (e) of Section 1784.43.

(s) This section shall become operative October 1,
 2026.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 2) and added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 354, Sec. 3.   (SB 766)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Operative October 1, 2026, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

2982.1.

It shall be unlawful for any seller to induce or attempt to induce any person to enter into a contract subject to this chapter by offering a rebate, discount, commission, or other consideration, contingent upon the happening of a future event, on the condition that the buyer either sells, or gives information or assistance for the purpose of leading to a sale by the seller of, the same or related goods.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 452.)
-------------------------------------------

2982.2.

(a) Prior to the execution of a conditional sale contract, the seller shall provide to a buyer, and obtain the buyer’s signature on, a written disclosure that sets forth the following information:

(1) (A) A description and the price of each item sold if the contract includes a charge for the item.

(B) Subparagraph (A) applies to each item in the following categories:

(i) A service contract.

(ii) An insurance product.

(iii) A debt cancellation agreement or guaranteed asset protection waiver agreement.

(iv) A theft deterrent device.

(v) A surface protection product.

(vi) A vehicle contract cancellation option agreement.

(2) The sum of all of the charges disclosed under subdivision (a), labeled “total.”

(3) The amount that would be calculated under the contract as the regular installment payment if charges for the items disclosed pursuant to subdivision (a) are not included in the contract. The amount disclosed pursuant to this subdivision shall be labeled “Installment
 Payment EXCLUDING Listed Items.”

(4) The amount that would be calculated under the contract as the regular installment payment if charges for the items disclosed under subdivision (a) are included in the contract. The amount disclosed pursuant to this subdivision shall be labeled “Installment Payment INCLUDING Listed Items.”

(b) The disclosures required under this section shall be in at least 10-point type and shall be contained in a document that is separate from the conditional sale contract and a purchase order.

(c) This section does not apply to the sale of a motorcycle, as defined in Section 400 of the Vehicle Code, or an off-highway vehicle subject to identification under Section 38010 of the Vehicle
 Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 283, Sec. 3.   (AB 2311)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

2982.3.

(a) The holder of a conditional sale contract may, upon agreement with the buyer, extend the scheduled due date or defer the scheduled payment of all or of any part of any installment or installments payable thereunder. No charge shall be made for any such extension or deferment unless the agreement for such extension or deferment is in writing and signed by the parties thereto. However, the seller or holder may, as an adjunct to or to assist in efforts to collect one or more delinquent installments on the contract, advise one or more obligors on the contract, either in writing or orally, that the due date for one or more
installments under the contract shall be extended, with no charge being made for such extension other than any applicable late charge provided for in the contract.

(b) Where the contract includes a finance charge determined on the precomputed basis, the holder may charge and contract for the payment of an extension or deferral agreement charge by the buyer and collect and receive the same, but such charge may not exceed an amount equal to 1 percent per month simple interest on the amount of the installment or installments, or part thereof, extended or deferred for the period of extension or deferral. Such period shall not exceed the period from the date when such extended or deferred installment or installments, or part thereof, would have been payable in the absence of such extension or deferral to the date when such installment or installments, or part thereof, are made payable under the agreement of extension or deferment; except that a
minimum charge of one dollar ($1) for the period of extension or deferral may be made in any case where the extension or deferral agreement charge, when computed at such rate, amounts to less than one dollar ($1).

(c) Where the contract includes a finance charge determined on the simple-interest basis, the holder may charge and contract for the payment of an extension or deferral agreement charge by the buyer and collect and receive the same, but the charge for the extension or deferral agreement may not exceed the lesser of twenty-five dollars ($25) or 10 percent of the then outstanding principal balance of the contract. Such charge shall be in addition to any finance charges which accrue because such extended or deferred payments are received at a time other than as originally scheduled.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 448, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

2982.5.

(a) This chapter may not be deemed to affect a loan, or the security therefor, between a purchaser of a motor vehicle and a supervised financial organization, other than the seller of the motor vehicle, all or a portion of which loan is used in connection with the purchase of a motor vehicle. As used in this chapter, “supervised financial organization” means a person organized, chartered, or holding a license or authorization certificate under a law of this state or the United States to make loans and subject to supervision by an
official or agency of this state or the United States.

(b) This chapter may not be deemed to prohibit the seller’s assisting the buyer in obtaining a loan upon any security from any third party to be used as a part or all of the downpayment or any other payment on a conditional sale contract or purchase order; provided that the conditional sale contract sets forth on its face the amount of the loan, the finance charge, the total thereof, the number of installments scheduled to repay the loan and the amount of each installment, that the buyer may be required to pledge security for the loan, which security shall be mutually agreed to by the buyer and the lender and notice to the buyer in at least 8-point type that he or she is obligated for the installment payments on both the conditional sale contract and the loan. The seller may not provide any security or other guarantee of payment on the loan, nor shall the seller receive any commission or
other remuneration for assisting the buyer to obtain the loan. If the buyer obligates himself or herself to purchase, or receives possession of, the motor vehicle prior to securing the loan, and if the buyer upon appropriate application for the loan is unable to secure the loan, on the conditions stated in the conditional sale contract, the conditional sale contract or purchase order shall be deemed rescinded and all consideration thereupon shall be returned by the respective parties without demand.

(c) The proceeds of any loan payable to the seller after the date of the contract but prior to the due date of the second payment otherwise scheduled thereunder may not be subject to a finance charge and the amount thereof shall be disclosed pursuant to subparagraph (D) of paragraph (6) of subdivision (a) of Section 2982.

(d) This chapter may not be deemed to prohibit the seller’s
assisting the buyer in obtaining a loan from any third party to be used to pay for the full purchase price, or any part thereof, of a motor vehicle, if each of the following provisions applies:

(1) The loan may be upon any security, but except as provided in paragraph (2), the loan may not be secured in whole or in part by a lien on real property. Any lien on real property taken in violation of this section shall be void and unenforceable.

(2) A lien on real property may be taken to secure a loan of seven thousand five hundred dollars ($7,500) or more used to pay the full purchase price, or any part thereof, of a recreational vehicle, as defined in Section 18010 of the Health and Safety Code, which is not less than 20 feet in length.

(3) The provisions of Sections 2983.2, 2983.3, and 2984.4 shall apply to the loan,
but may not authorize the lender or the lender’s successor in interest to charge for any costs, fees, or expenses or to obtain any other benefit which the lender is prohibited from charging or obtaining under any regulatory law applicable to the lender. Notwithstanding this paragraph, the provisions of Sections 2983.2 and 2983.3 may not apply to a loan made by a lender licensed under Division 9 (commencing with Section 22000) or Division 10 (commencing with Section 24000) of the Financial Code.

(4) The lender or the lender’s successor in interest shall be subject to all claims and defenses which the buyer could assert against the seller, but liability may not exceed the amount of the loan.

(5) If the buyer becomes obligated to purchase, or receives possession of, the motor vehicle prior to obtaining the loan, the agreement between the buyer and the seller shall set forth on its
face the amount of the loan, the finance charge, the total thereof, the number of installments scheduled to repay the loan and the amount of each installment, that the buyer may be required to pledge security for the loan, which security must be mutually agreed to by the buyer and the lender, and notice to the buyer in at least 8-point type that the buyer is obligated for the installment payments on the loan and for any payments which may be due on the agreement between the buyer and the seller. The seller may not provide any security or other guarantee of payment on the loan, and the seller may not receive any commission or other remuneration for assisting the buyer to obtain the loan. If the buyer upon proper application for the loan is unable to obtain the loan, on the condition stated in the agreement between the buyer and the seller, the agreement shall be deemed rescinded and all consideration thereupon shall be returned by the respective parties without demand.

(6) Any waiver by the buyer of the provisions of this section shall be void and unenforceable.

This subdivision does not apply to state or federally chartered banks and savings and loan associations and may not be construed to affect existing law regarding a seller’s assisting a buyer to obtain a loan from a bank or savings and loan association or any loan obtained by the buyer from those lenders.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 37, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

2982.7.

(a) Any payment made by a buyer to a seller pending execution of a conditional sale contract shall be refunded to the buyer in the event the conditional sale contract is not executed.

(b) In the event of breach by the seller of a conditional sale contract or purchase order where the buyer leaves his motor vehicle with the seller as downpayment and such motor vehicle is not returned by the seller to the buyer for whatever reason, the buyer may recover from the seller either the fair market value of the motor vehicle left as a downpayment or its value as stated in the contract or
purchase order, whichever is greater. The recovery shall be tendered to the buyer within five business days after the breach.

(c) The remedies of the buyer provided for in subdivision (b) are nonexclusive and cumulative and shall not preclude the buyer from pursuing any other remedy which he may have under any other provision of law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1285.)
-------------------------------------------

2982.8.

(a) If a buyer is obligated under the terms of the conditional sale contract to maintain insurance on the vehicle and subsequent to the execution of the contract the buyer either fails to maintain or requests the holder to procure the insurance, any amounts advanced by the holder to procure the insurance may be the subject of finance charges from the date of advance as provided in subdivision (e).

(b) These amounts shall be secured as provided in the contract and permitted by Section 2984.2 if the holder notifies the buyer in writing of his or her option to repay
those amounts in any one of the following ways:

(1) Full payment within 10 days from the date of giving or mailing the notice. 

(2) Full amortization during the term of the insurance.

(3) If offered by the holder, full amortization after the term of the conditional sale contract, to be payable in installments which do not exceed the average payment allocable to a monthly period under the contract.

(4) If offered by the holder, a combination of the methods described in paragraphs (2) and (3), so that there is some amortization during the term of the insurance, with the remainder of the amortization being accomplished after the term of the conditional sale contract, to be payable in installments which do not exceed the average payment allocable to a
monthly period under the original terms of the contract.

(5) If offered by the holder, any other amortization plan.

If the buyer neither pays in full the amounts advanced nor notifies the holder in writing of his or her choice regarding amortization options before the expiration of 10 days from the date of giving or mailing the notice by the holder, the holder may amortize the amounts advanced on a secured basis pursuant to paragraph (2) or, if offered by the holder as an option to the buyer, paragraph (3) or (4).

(c) The written notification described in subdivision (b) shall also set forth the amounts advanced by the holder and, with respect to each amortization plan the amount of the additional finance charge, the sum of the amounts advanced and the additional finance charge, the number of installments required, the amount of each
installment and the date for payment of the installments.

In addition, the notice shall contain a statement in contrasting red print in at least 8-point bold type, which reads as follows:
“WARNING—IT IS YOUR RESPONSIBILITY UNDER CALIFORNIA LAW TO OBTAIN LIABILITY INSURANCE OR BE SUBJECT TO PENALTIES FOR VIOLATING SECTION 16020 OF THE VEHICLE CODE, WHICH MAY INCLUDE LOSS OF LICENSE OR A FINE. THE INSURANCE ACQUIRED BY THE LIENHOLDER DOES NOT PROVIDE LIABILITY COVERAGE AND DOES NOT SATISFY YOUR RESPONSIBILITY UNDER CALIFORNIA LAW.”

(d) If subsequent to the execution of the contract the holder advances amounts for repairs to or preservation of the motor vehicle or preservation of the holder’s security interest therein and such advances are occasioned by the buyer’s default under the contract, such advances may be the subject of finance charges from the date of advance as provided in subdivision
(e) and shall be secured as provided in the contract and permitted by Section 2984.2.

(e) The maximum rate of finance charge which may be imposed on amounts advanced by the holder subsequent to the execution of the contract for insurance, repairs to or preservation of the motor vehicle, or preservation of the holder’s security interest therein, shall not exceed the annual percentage rate disclosed pursuant to Section 2982.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1092, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

2982.9.

In the event a buyer obligates himself to purchase, or receive possession of, a motor vehicle pursuant to a contract or purchase order, and the seller knows that the buyer intends to obtain financing from a third party without the assistance of the seller, and the buyer is unable to obtain such financing, the contract or purchase order shall be deemed rescinded and all consideration thereupon shall be returned by the respective parties without demand.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1285.)
-------------------------------------------

2982.10.

(a) In consideration of the assignment of a conditional sale contract, the seller shall not receive or accept from the assignee any payment or credit based upon any amount collected or received, or to be collected or received, under the contract as a finance charge except to the extent the payment or credit does not exceed the amount that would be calculated in accordance with Regulation Z, whether or not Regulation Z applies to the contract, as the contract’s finance charge using, for the purposes of the
calculation, an annual percentage rate equal to 2.5 percent for a contract having an original scheduled term of 60 monthly payments or less or 2 percent for a contract having an original scheduled term of more than 60 monthly payments.

(b) Subdivision (a) does not apply in the following circumstances:

(1) An assignment that is with full recourse or under other terms requiring the seller to bear the entire risk of financial performance of the buyer.

(2) An assignment that is more than six months following the date of the conditional sale contract.

(3) Isolated instances resulting from bona fide errors that would otherwise constitute a violation of subdivision (a) if the seller maintains reasonable procedures to guard against any errors and promptly, upon
notice of the error, remits to the assignee any consideration received in excess of that permitted by subdivision (a).

(4) The assignment of a conditional sale contract involving the sale of a motorcycle, as defined in Section 400 of the Vehicle Code.

(5) The assignment of a conditional sale contract involving the sale of an off-highway motor vehicle that is subject to identification under Section 38010 of the Vehicle Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 128, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2006.   Operative July 1, 2006, by Sec. 12 of Ch. 128.)
-------------------------------------------

2982.11.

(a) Prior to the execution of a conditional sale contract that includes a charge for an electric vehicle charging station, the seller shall provide the buyer with, and obtain the buyer’s signature on, a written disclosure that includes a description and price of each of the following:

(1) The electric vehicle charging station device.

(2) Any materials and wiring.

(3) Any installation services included in the total charge.

(b) The disclosures required under this section shall be in at least 12-point type and shall be contained in a document that is separate from the conditional sale contract or purchase order.

(c) This section shall become operative July 1, 2013.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 675, Sec. 3.   (AB 2502)   Effective September 27, 2012.   Section operative July 1, 2013, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

2982.12.

(a) (1) A guaranteed asset protection waiver may be offered, sold, or provided to a buyer, or administered, in connection with a conditional sale contract subject to this chapter only in compliance with this chapter and paragraph (2) of subdivision (h) of Section 1758.992 of the Insurance Code.

(2) A guaranteed asset protection waiver, which may be titled as an addendum, forms part of the conditional sale contract and remains a part of the conditional sale contract upon the assignment, sale, or transfer of that conditional sale contract.

(3) Neither the extension of credit, the term of credit, nor the terms of a conditional sale contract may be conditioned upon the purchase of a
 guaranteed asset protection waiver.

(4) (A) The terms and conditions of the guaranteed asset protection waiver, including those terms required by subdivision (b), shall appear on a document separate from the conditional sale contract and a buyer or potential buyer shall separately sign the document setting forth the guaranteed asset protection waiver’s terms and conditions in addition to the conditional sale contract.

(B) The separate document displaying the guaranteed asset protection waiver’s terms and conditions shall do the following:

(i) Conspicuously state that the guaranteed asset protection waiver is an optional addition to the conditional sale contract, and that the holder of the conditional sale contract is the contracting party to the guaranteed asset protection waiver, and state the
 name and mailing address of the seller. If the conditional sale contract is assigned, written notice of the assignment of both the conditional sale contract and guaranteed asset protection waiver, and the assignee’s name and mailing address, shall be provided to the buyer in person or by mail, or by a means of notice that the buyer previously agreed to with the seller or holder in connection with the conditional sale contract within 30 days of the assignment.

(ii) Conspicuously disclose the name and mailing address of any administrator known as of the date of the sale. In this section, “administrator” means any person, other than an insurer, that performs administrative or operational functions in connection with the guaranteed asset protection waiver. An administrator is deemed to be an agent of the contemporaneous holder with respect to performance of the holder’s obligations under the guaranteed asset protection waiver and this section.

(iii) Contain a notice with a heading in at least 12-point bold type and the text in at least 10-point bold type, circumscribed by a line, immediately above the contract signature line, that reads as follows:
STOP AND READ:

YOU CANNOT BE REQUIRED TO BUY A GAP WAIVER OR ANY OTHER OPTIONAL ADD-ON PRODUCTS OR SERVICES. IT IS OPTIONAL.

NO ONE CAN MAKE YOU BUY A GAP WAIVER OR ANY OTHER OPTIONAL ADD-ON PRODUCTS OR SERVICES TO GET FINANCING, TO GET CERTAIN FINANCING TERMS, OR TO GET CERTAIN TERMS FOR THE SALE OF A VEHICLE.

IT IS UNLAWFUL TO REQUIRE OR ATTEMPT TO REQUIRE THE PURCHASE OF THIS GAP WAIVER OR ANY OTHER OPTIONAL ADD-ON PRODUCTS OR SERVICES.
(5) A person that sells a guaranteed asset protection waiver subject to this chapter shall not do either of the following:

(A) Charge more for the guaranteed asset protection waiver than 4 percent of the amount the buyer finances under a conditional sale contract.

(B) Sell a guaranteed asset protection waiver if one of the following applies:

(i) The amount financed through the conditional sale contract exceeds a maximum dollar amount covered by the guaranteed asset protection waiver.

(ii) The conditional sale contract’s loan-to-value ratio at the contracting date exceeds the maximum loan-to-value ratio covered by the guaranteed asset protection waiver, unless the terms of the guaranteed asset protection waiver conspicuously disclose the
 maximum loan-to-value ratio limitation, including the method by which the limitation is applied, and the buyer is informed in a writing, acknowledged by the buyer, that the amount financed in the buyer’s conditional sale contract exceeds the waiver’s maximum loan-to-value limitation and therefore the waiver will not cover the total amount owed on the conditional sale contract. As used in this subclause, “loan-to-value ratio” means the total amount financed through a conditional sale contract as a percentage of the manufacturer suggested retail price for a new motor vehicle or the average retail value for a used motor vehicle, as determined by a nationally recognized pricing guide, as defined in paragraph (2) of subdivision (c) of Section 11950 of the Vehicle Code.

(iii) The amount financed through a conditional sale contract is less than 70 percent of the manufacturer suggested retail price for a new motor vehicle or the average retail value
 for a used motor vehicle, as determined by a nationally recognized pricing guide, as defined in paragraph (2) of subdivision (c) of Section 11950 of the Vehicle Code.

(6) Notwithstanding any provision in any conditional sale contract for the sale of a motor vehicle to the contrary, when communicating in writing an itemized contract balance to the buyer, including a payoff letter, payoff quote, or any written notice required under subdivision (a) of Section 2983.2 of this code or subdivision (b) of Section 22328 of the Financial Code, the holder of a conditional sale contract that includes a guaranteed asset protection waiver shall do either of the following:

(A) Individually identify as a credit or refund available to the buyer the unearned portion of all guaranteed asset protection waiver charges paid by the buyer as of the date of the communication on a pro rata basis.
